Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Structures Unfit for Occupation or Use

13-21-101. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Dwelling” means any building or structure, or part thereof, used and occupied for human occupation or use or intended to be so used, and includes any outhouses and appurtenances belonging thereto or usually enjoyed therewith;

“Governing body” means the council, commission, or board, or other legislative body, charged with governing a municipality;

“Municipality” means any city or town;

“Owner” means the holder of the title in fee simple and every mortgagee of record;

“Parties in interest” means all individuals, associations, corporations and others who have interests of record in a structure and any who are in possession thereof;

“Place of public accommodation” means any building or structure in which goods are supplied or services performed, or in which the trade of the general public is solicited;

“Public authority” means any housing authority or any officer who is in charge of any department or branch of the government of the municipality or state relating to health, fire, building regulations, or other activities concerning structures in the municipality;

“Public officer” means any officer or officers of a municipality or the executive director or other chief executive officer of any commission or authority established by such municipality or jointly with any other municipality who is authorized by ordinance adopted hereunder to exercise the power prescribed by such ordinances and by this part; and

“Structure” means any dwelling or place of public accommodation or vacant building or structure suitable as a dwelling or place of public accommodation.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.30 (Williams, § 3647.43); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1201; Acts 1985, ch. 286, §§ 1, 5; 1986, ch. 706, § 1; 1995, ch. 391, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1986, ch. 820 contained the Municipal Development Authority Act of 1986 containing an alternative method of municipal planning; however, this act was amended to eventually be applicable only to Johnson City and is listed in the Uncodified Acts Index.

Cross-References. Local neighborhood model development corporations, title 13, ch. 13.

Law Reviews.

The Indigent Tenant in Tennessee (William E. Caldwell), 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 117.

13-21-102. Structures unfit for human occupation or use — Power of municipalities to demolish — Program to remedy the unsafe conditions caused by the unfinished structure and the suspended construction.

Whenever any municipality of this state finds that there exists in such municipality structures which are unfit for human occupation or use due to dilapidation, defects increasing the hazards of fire, accident or other calamities, lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities, or due to other conditions rendering such structures unsafe or unsanitary, or dangerous or detrimental to the health, safety or morals, or otherwise inimical to the welfare of the residents of such municipality, power is hereby conferred upon such municipality to exercise its police powers to repair, close or demolish the aforementioned structure in the manner herein provided.

As used in this subsection (b):

“Abandoned construction” means that construction of an unfinished structure has ceased and that no good faith effort has been made to complete the construction for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days; and

“Suspended construction” means that construction of an unfinished structure has ceased and that no good faith effort has been made to complete the construction for a period of sixty (60) days.

This subsection (b) applies to any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700) or located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred thirty thousand four hundred (130,400) nor more than one hundred thirty thousand five hundred (130,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

When any municipality to which this subsection (b) applies finds that there are structures in the municipality unfit for human occupation or use because of suspended construction, the municipality may use the procedures in this part to remedy the unsafe conditions caused by the unfinished structure and the suspended construction. All the applicable procedures set out in § 13-21-103 apply, but upon the public officer's finding that construction has been suspended and that the unfinished structure and the suspended construction create conditions that are dangerous or injurious to the health or safety of neighboring residents or the general public or the safety of neighboring structures, the public officer is limited to ordering that construction resume or that the owner make the unfinished structure safe by boarding up the structure, removing construction debris and other safety hazards from the construction area, and otherwise removing or neutralizing health or safety hazards. If the owner fails to take the actions within ten (10) days after being ordered to do so, the municipality may cause the unfinished structure to be boarded up and the debris and other health and safety hazards removed or neutralized. The costs of doing so shall be assessed against the owner and may be collected as provided in § 13-21-103(6).

When the municipality finds that there are structures in the municipality unfit for human occupation or use because of abandoned construction, the municipality may use all the procedures, remedies and rights in this part to deal with the unfinished structure and the abandoned construction. When an unfinished structure meets both the definition of suspended construction and abandoned construction, it may be dealt with as abandoned construction.

An ordinance adopted by a municipality pursuant to this subsection (b) shall provide that the public officer may determine that a structure is unfit for human occupation or use if the public officer finds that conditions exist in the structure that are dangerous or injurious to the health, safety or morals of the occupants of the structure, the occupants of neighboring structures or other residents of the municipality or to the safety of neighboring structures. These conditions may include, but are not limited to:

Defects increasing the hazards of fire, accident or other calamities;

Lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities;

Dilapidation;

Disrepair;

Structural defects;

Uncleanliness; or

Suspended construction or abandoned construction.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.31 (Williams, § 3647.42); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1202; Acts 1985, ch. 286, § 5; 2009, ch. 114, § 1; 2012, ch. 663, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-21-103. Adoption of ordinances — Required provisions.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance finding that conditions of the character described in § 13-21-102 exist within a municipality, the governing body of the municipality is hereby authorized to adopt ordinances relating to the structures within the municipality which are unfit for human occupation or use. Such ordinances shall include the following provisions, that:

A public officer be designated or appointed to exercise the powers prescribed by the ordinances;

Whenever a petition is filed with the public officer by a public authority or by at least five (5) residents of the municipality charging that any structure is unfit for human occupation or use, or whenever it appears to the public officer, on the public officer's own motion, that any structure is unfit for occupation or use, the public officer shall, if the public officer's preliminary investigation discloses a basis for such charges, issue and cause to be served upon the owner of and parties in interest of such structure, a complaint stating the charges in that respect and containing a notice that a hearing will be held before the public officer, or the public officer's designated agent, at a place therein fixed, not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days after the serving of the complaint, that:

The owner and parties in interest shall be given the right to file an answer to the complaint and to appear in person, or otherwise, and give testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint; and

The rules of evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity shall not be controlling in hearings before the public officer;

If, after such notice and hearing, the public officer determines that the structure under consideration is unfit for human occupation or use, the public officer shall state in writing the public officer's findings of fact in support of such determination and shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner thereof an order:

If the repair, alteration or improvement of the structure can be made at a reasonable cost in relation to the value of the structure (the ordinance of the municipality may fix a certain percentage of such cost as being reasonable for such purpose), requiring the owner, within the time specified in the order, to repair, alter or improve such structure to render it fit for human occupation or use or to vacate and close the structure as a place of human occupation or use; or

If the repair, alteration or improvement of the structure cannot be made at a reasonable cost in relation to the value of the structure (the ordinance of the municipality may fix a certain percentage of such cost as being reasonable for such purpose), requiring the owner, within the time specified in the order, to remove or demolish such structure;

If the owner fails to comply with an order to repair, alter or improve or to vacate and close the structure, the public officer may cause such structure to be repaired, altered or improved, or to be vacated and closed; that the public officer may cause to be posted on the main entrance of any structure so closed, a placard with the following words: “This building is unfit for human occupation or use. The use or occupation of this building for human occupation or use is prohibited and unlawful”;

If the owner fails to comply with an order to remove or demolish the structure, the public officer may cause such structure to be removed or demolished; and

The amount of the cost of such repairs, alterations or improvements, or vacating and closing, or removal or demolition by the public officer, as well as reasonable fees for registration, inspections and professional evaluations of the property, shall be assessed against the owner of the property, and shall, upon the certification of the sum owed being presented to the municipal tax collector, be a lien on the property in favor of the municipality, second only to liens of the state, county and municipality for taxes, any lien of the municipality for special assessments, and any valid lien, right or interest in such property duly recorded or duly perfected by filing, prior to the filing of such notice. These costs shall be collected by the municipal tax collector or county trustee at the same time and in the same manner as property taxes are collected. If the owner fails to pay the costs, they may be collected at the same time and in the same manner as delinquent property taxes are collected and shall be subject to the same penalty and interest as delinquent property taxes as set forth in §§ 67-5-2010 and 67-5-2410. In addition, the municipality may collect the costs assessed against the owner through an action for debt filed in any court of competent jurisdiction. The municipality may bring one (1) action for debt against more than one (1) or all of the owners of properties against whom the costs have been assessed, and the fact that multiple owners have been joined in one (1) action shall not be considered by the court as a misjoinder of parties. If the structure is removed or demolished by the public officer, the public officer shall sell the materials of such structure and shall credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost of the removal or demolition, and any balance remaining shall be deposited in the chancery court by the public officer, shall be secured in such manner as may be directed by such court, and shall be disbursed by such court to the person found to be entitled thereto by final order or decree of such court. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement, by summary proceedings or otherwise.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.32 (Williams, § 3647.44); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1203; Acts 1985, ch. 286, §§ 2, 3, 5; 1989, ch. 298, § 1; 1991, ch. 515, § 2; 1993, ch. 210, § 2; 2005, ch. 3, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 46.

13-21-104. Conditions rendering structure unfit for human occupation or use.

An ordinance adopted by a municipality under this part shall provide that the public officer may determine that a structure is unfit for human occupation or use if the public officer finds that conditions exist in such structure which are dangerous or injurious to the health, safety or morals of the occupants of such structure, the occupants of neighboring structures or other residents of such municipality. Such conditions may include the following, without limiting the generality of the foregoing: defects therein increasing the hazards of fire, accident, or other calamities; lack of adequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities; dilapidation; disrepair; structural defects; or uncleanliness. Such ordinance may provide additional standards to guide the public officer, or the public officer's agents, in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human occupation or use.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.33 (Williams, § 3647.45); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1204; Acts 1985, ch. 286, § 5.

13-21-105. Service of complaints or orders.

Complaints or orders issued by a public officer pursuant to an ordinance adopted under this part shall be served upon persons either personally or by registered mail, but if the whereabouts of such persons are unknown and the same cannot be ascertained by the public officer in the exercise of reasonable diligence, and the public officer shall make an affidavit to that effect, then the serving of such complaint or order upon such persons may be made by publishing the same once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper printed and published in the municipality, or in the absence of such newspaper, in one printed and published in the county and circulating in the municipality in which the structures are located. A copy of such complaint or order shall be posted in a conspicuous place on premises affected by the complaint or order. A copy of such complaint or order shall also be filed for record in the register's office of the county in which the structure is located, and such filing of the complaint or order shall have the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.34 (Williams, § 3647.46); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1205; Acts 1985, ch. 286, § 5.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

13-21-106. Enjoining enforcement of order.

Any person affected by an order issued by the public officer may file a bill in the chancery court for an injunction restraining the public officer from carrying out the order, and the court may, upon the filing of such bill, issue a temporary injunction restraining the public officer pending the final disposition of the cause; provided, that within sixty (60) days after the posting and service of the order of the public officer, such person shall file such bill in the court. Hearings shall be had by the court on such bills within twenty (20) days, or as soon thereafter as possible, and shall be given preference over other matters on the court's calendar.

The court shall hear and determine the issues raised and shall enter such final order or decree as law and justice may require. In all such proceedings, the findings of the public officer as to facts, if supported by evidence, shall be conclusive. Costs shall be in the discretion of the court. The remedies herein provided shall be exclusive remedies, and no person affected by an order of the public officer shall be entitled to recover any damages for action taken pursuant to any order of the public officer, or because of noncompliance by such person with any order of the public officer.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.35 (Williams, § 3647.47); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1206.

13-21-107. Powers given public officer by ordinance.

An ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality may authorize the public officer to exercise such powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted, to:

Investigate conditions in the municipality in order to determine which structures therein are unfit for human occupation or use;

Administer oaths, affirmations, examine witnesses and receive evidence;

Enter upon premises for the purpose of making examinations; provided, that such entries shall be made in such manner as to cause the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession;

Appoint and fix the duties of such officers, agents and employees as the public officer deems necessary to carry out the purposes of the ordinances; and

Delegate any of such public officer's functions and powers under the ordinance to such officers and agents as the public officer may designate.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.36 (Williams, § 3647.48); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1207; Acts 1985, ch. 286, §§ 4, 5.

13-21-108. Estimate of annual expenses and costs.

The governing body of any municipality adopting an ordinance under this part shall, as soon as possible thereafter, prepare an estimate of the annual expenses or costs to provide the equipment, personnel and supplies necessary for periodic examinations and investigations of the structures in such municipality, for the purpose of determining the fitness of such structures for human occupation or use, and for the enforcement and administration of its ordinances adopted under this part, and any such municipality is authorized to make such appropriation from its revenues as it may deem necessary for this purpose, and may accept and apply grants or donations to assist it in carrying out such ordinances.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.37 (Williams, § 3647.49); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1208; Acts 1985, ch. 286, § 5.

13-21-109. Part confers supplementary powers.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of any department of any municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or its ordinances or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof, and the powers conferred by this part shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

Acts 1939, ch. 152, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.38 (Williams, § 3647.50); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1209.

13-21-110. Violation of order to vacate structure declared unfit for human occupation — Authorizing or facilitating occupancy — Penalty.

Any occupied structure declared unfit for human occupation or use shall be immediately vacated as ordered by the public officer designated or appointed to exercise the powers prescribed by any ordinance adopted pursuant to the authority of this part.

Any person who violates an order to vacate a structure declared unfit for human occupation or use commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Any owner, manager, or person responsible for a structure declared unfit for human occupation or use who authorizes or facilitates the occupancy of the structure commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 2015, ch. 244, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.